New York, session 2025-2026, S1466.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3.09 of the parks, recreation and historic preser- 2 vation law is amended by adding a new subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. Shall develop and post on its website a senior trail guide that 4 identifies walking and hiking opportunities for active seniors within 5 the state park system and along public non-motorized multi-use trails 6 within the state. Such guide shall include, but not be limited to: iden- 7 tification of low impact trails and routes appropriately accessible for 8 patrons aged sixty-two years and older; listing of any impediments to 9 mobility along such identified trails or routes such as steep inclines, 10 declines, or uneven terrain; and identification of corresponding activ- 11 ities or amenities along or in close proximity to such trails and routes 12 such as the location of birding areas or geologically or historically 13 significant sites. The office shall update the senior trail guide from 14 time to time. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 16 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04453-01-5